Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.030

Association name—Immunity from liability of association board members and officers.

(1) The name of any association subject to this chapter must comply with Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

(2) No corporation or association organized or doing business in this state shall be entitled to use the term "cooperative" as a part of its corporate or other business name or title, unless it: (a) Is subject to the provisions of this chapter or chapter 23.78, 23.100, or 31.12 RCW; (b) is subject to the provisions of chapter 24.06 RCW and operating on a cooperative basis; (c) is, on July 23, 1989, an organization lawfully using the term "cooperative" as part of its corporate or other business name or title; or (d) is a nonprofit corporation or association the voting members of which are corporations or associations operating on a cooperative basis. Any corporation or association violating the provisions of this section may be enjoined from doing business under such name at the instance of any member or any association subject to this chapter.

(3) A member of the board of directors or an officer of any association subject to this chapter shall have the same immunity from liability as is granted in RCW 4.24.264.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1403; 2015 c 176 s 9103; 1989 c 307 s 5; 1987 c 212 s 706; 1913 c 19 s 17; RRS s 3920. Formerly RCW 23.56.030.]

NOTES:

Uniformity of application and construction—Savings—2019 c 37: See RCW 23.100.1501 and 23.100.1503.

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.